Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.100

Center line.

"Center line" means the line, marked or unmarked, parallel to and equidistant from the sides of a two-way traffic roadway of a highway except where otherwise indicated by painted lines or markers.

[ 1975 c 62 s 3; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.100. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 11; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 62: See note following RCW 36.75.010.